Maryland, session 2026, HB0993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–126.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0993*

HOUSE BILL 993
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “OPERATOR” MEANS THE PROPRIETOR OF ANY DWELLING,
LODGING, OR SLEEPING ACCOMMODATIONS OFFERED AS A SHORT–TERM RENTAL,
WHETHER IN THE CAPACITY OF OWNER, LESSEE, SUBLESSEE, MORTGAGEE IN
POSSESSION, LICENSEE, OR ANY OTHER POSSESSORY CAPACITY.
(3) (I) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL DWELLING
UNIT OR A PORTION OF THE UNIT, INCLUDING AN ACCESSORY DWELLING, USED TO
PROVIDE HOUSING FOR LESS THAN 31 CONSECUTIVE DAYS.
(II) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL” DOES NOT INCLUDE A HOTEL OR
MOTEL, BOARDING HOUSE, GROUP RESIDENTIAL FACILITY FOR STUDENTS,
FRATERNITY OR SORORITY HOUSE, OR SIMILAR HOUSING.
(B) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT
ENACT A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE PROHIBITING AN OPERATOR FROM OFFERING
A PROPERTY AS A SHORT–TERM RENTAL SOLELY BECAUSE THE OPERATOR IS A
LESSEE OR SUBLESSEE OF THE PROPERTY.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY
ENACT A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE PROHIBITING AN OPERATOR FROM OPERATING
MORE THAN ONE PROPERTY IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY AS A SHORT–TERM
RENTAL IF THE OPERATOR IS A LESSEE OR SUBLESSEE OF THE PROPERTY.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED AS PROHIBITING A;
(1) A PROPERTY OWNER FROM PROHIBITING OR LIMITING THE USE
OF THE PROPERTY BY A LESSEE OR SUBLESSEE AS A SHORT–TERM RENTAL; OR
(2) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT FROM REQUIRING AN
OPERATOR TO REGISTER A SHORT–TERM RENTAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.